Utah statutes.
10-9a-708.   Final decision.
(1)  A decision of an appeal authority takes effect on the date when the
appeal authority issues a written decision, or as otherwise provided by
ordinance.
(2)  A written decision, or other event as provided by ordinance, constitutes
a final decision under Subsection 10-9a-801(2)(a) or a final action under
Subsection 10-9a-801(4).
